New Jersey, session 222, S3640.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Lead agency of the New Jersey E-ZPass Group means an agency, authority, or political subdivision of this State that has the authority to enter into, manage, or negotiate contracts to provide service to accounts with a New Jersey electronic toll collection system subject to sections 6 through 10 of P.L.1997, c.59 (C.27:23-34.1 through C.27:23-34.5) or sections 11 through 15 of P.L.1997, c.59 (C.27:25A-21.1 through C.27:25A-21.5). Service fee means an additional amount added to the monthly billing statement of an electronic toll collection system account holder for the primary purpose of having enrolled in the States electronic toll collection system and not for actual usage of the electronic toll collection system. b.    The New Jersey Turnpike Authority, or an entity contracted by the lead agency of the New Jersey E-ZPass Group to administer the States electronic toll collection system, shall not charge a service fee to an electronic toll collection system account holder. 2.    a.  As used in this section: Lead agency of the New Jersey E-ZPass Group means an agency, authority, or political subdivision of this State that has the authority to enter into, manage, or negotiate contracts to provide service to accounts with a New Jersey electronic toll collection system subject to sections 6 through 10 of P.L.1997, c.59 (C.27:23-34.1 through C.27:23-34.5) or sections 11 through 15 of P.L.1997, c.59 (C.27:25A-21.1 through C.27:25A-21.5). Service fee means an additional amount added to the monthly billing statement of an electronic toll collection system account holder for the primary purpose of having enrolled in the States electronic toll collection system and not for actual usage of the electronic toll collection system. b.    The South Jersey Transportation Authority, or an entity contracted by the lead agency of the New Jersey E-ZPass Group to administer the States electronic toll collection system, shall not charge a service fee to an electronic toll collection system account holder. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.